g2p.foma
define odzException dzh -> [d zh] || .#. o _ ,, dz -> [d z] || .#. o _  ;
define viachlasException hh -> [c h] || .#. {via} _ {las} ;
define beginingDe {bat} | {ce} | {fekt} | [f i n i t ii v] | {inte} | {k} | {leg} | {lim} | [l t [a | aa | y | .#. | e | u | o]] | [m a m i .#.] | [m o m .#.] | {mo} | [m [aa | a | u | [aa m] | e | [aa hh] ] .#.] | {nis} | {nzi} | {sig} | {sti} | {tail} | {tek} | [v ii z] | z | [zh [k | i | o]] ; 
# [k aa d] | {kel} | {kl} | {kor} | [k oo r] | {krement} | [k r ee t] | 
define dePrefix {akt} | {bati} | [b a t ii] | {batn} | {batov} | {batuj} | {bil} | [b r e c ii n] | {but} | [c i \e] | [c i .#.] | {dikov} | {dikuj} | {duk} | {fault} | {fic} | {fin} | {form} | {gene} | [g r e s ii v] | {gust} | {hydr} | [k oo d] | [l f ii n] | {menc} | {ment} | {militar} | {nomin} | [n t aa l] | [o ks y] | [oo n] | {pono} | {pres} | {ratiz} | {rby} | [r i v aa c] | [r i v aa t] | {rma} | [r m i t ii] | [r n i ee] | [sh p e k t] | [sh t r u] | {tegov} | {teguj} | {term} | [t o ks] | {ton} | {valv} | {vast} | {vel} ; 
define deExceptions {de} @-> [ŧde] || .#. _ beginingDe , _ dePrefix , {evi} | [k o r e sh p o n] | {kre} | {prezi} | {respon} | [sh t u] | [\v | .#.] i _ n , .#. {vi} _ a | [aa] | [ii] | o | u , {mo} _ l | m | r , .#. i _ a | [aa] | [ii] | u , i _ {nti} | o , {fe} _ r | [ks] , {in} _ [ks] , .#. {ka} _ t , [\sh a] | [.#. a] _ k , [\sh a] | [.#. a] _ p , {je} _ n .#. | [n aa \.#.] | [n k r aa], [k a zh] | {mla} _ j , {po} | {pre} _ [nj] .#. , {bor} | [.#. a] _ l , {aka} | {epi} _ m , {in} | [k oo] _ [ks] , {ten} _ {nc} | [n ts] , {ho} | [zh i a] _ n .#. , {po} _ [ks p o] , [l ii] _ r , {oro} | u | l | r | [sh e] _ j .#. , {kon} _ {nz} , .#. z _ [n ShortVowelPhonem .#.] | {nk} | {nek} , a _ {nc} | {nt} , {ran} _ .#. | v , {ka} _ [r n ii] , {dezi} _ r ; 
# Breaking divadelná: a _ l 
define deForeignExceptions [d e] @-> [ŧde] || [rz ?*] _ , _ [?* rz] , _ {sktop} ; 
define beginingDi [aa] | [ee] | {ec} | {eno} | [e t \k] | [f t ii n] | {men} | [n aa r] | p | s | [v ii z] | {zajn} ; 
define diPrefix {abet} | {agn} | {agram} | {akriti} | {alekt} | {amant} | {amet} | {ck} | {dakti} | [ee t [n | o |u]] | f | g | {kobraz} | {kt} | {lem} | {menz} | {nosaur} | o | [oo] | r | {scip} | {sp} | {st} | {stic} | [sh p u t] | [sh t r i k] | {ureti} | {verz} | {zmus} ; 
define diPostfix .#. {au} | {expe} | {han} | {in} | {kre} | [.#. l yy] | {melo} | [m e l oo] | {meto} | [m ee] | {mo} | {or} | {skan} | [sh t a] | [sh t aa] | [sh t i p e n] | [sh t u] | [sh t uu] | {tra} ; 
define diExceptions [d i] @-> [ŧdi] || {ru} | {se} _ {ment} , [sh k a n] _ [n aa v] | {nav} , a | [[\d | .#.] e] | o | n _ [ts n VowelPhonem] , .#. _ beginingDi , _ diPrefix , {me} _ [[t \l] | [a \r] | [a .#.] | [r \[y]] | e | i | o | u | y | aa | ee | ije | ii | oo | uo | uu | ou | yy | j|b|d|dj|dz|dzh|g|h|z|zh|v|m|n|nj|l|p|tj|c|ts|k|hh|s|sh|f] , [aa] _ i .#. , [aa] _ a | [aa] | i | [ii] | o | u , {ra} _ [a ts] | [aa] | {us} | [ks] , diPostfix _ , {perio} | [sh t a n d a r] _ z , {man} _ t , {re} _ g , .#. [o | {po} | {pre} | {na}] _ [sh] , [.#. o] | [.#. p r e] _ n | s , .#. e _ t , {invali} _ t | z , {pre} _ k , o | {pre} _ c | k | {zol} | {zb} | [ŧde o l] , _ k .#. , .#. {ra} _ [k aa l] , .#. i _ l | o , .#. {ko} _ {fi} , .#. _ a .#. | [a l [oo | yy]] , .#. _ [ts] .#. , {kan} _ d | z , .#. _ {va} .#. | {ve} .#. | [v aa m] .#. | {vou} .#. | {vami} .#. , {hen} _ {kep} , _ {sku} \.#. , .#. z _ {skre} , [t r a g ee] _ \.#. , {neo} _ [sh] , .#. _ {an} \[i | ii | e .#. | ee] , .#. _ {zert} [a | aa | u] , [oo] _ u | [aa] | a | [ii] , 
 {pe} _ {atr} | {ater} , [p ee] _ [a | e | u | ii | i | [aa m] | [aa hh] | {ou} | {ami}] .#. , o _ {gnor} , {kar} _ [n aa l] , {fro} _ t , {ra} _ {us} , {pu} _ {ng} , {gla} _ [aa] , {klau} _ , [ŧde] _ {kov} | {kuj} , .#. {ju} _ t , {ju} _ {kat} | [k aa t] , {syn} _ k ; 
define diForeignExceptions [d i] @-> [ŧdi] || [rz ?*] _ , _ [?* rz] ; 
define diiExceptions [d ii] @-> [ŧdii] || .#. {na} | o | {po} | {pre} _ d | [dj] , [.#. {expe}] | [.#. {tra}] _ , {mla} _ .#. , .#. {na} | .#. o | .#. {po} | .#. {pre} _ [s tj] .#. , [r aa] _ i , [uu] _ i , {kon} _ {ci} , _ {ler} , .#. {hr} _ .#. , {kroko} _ l , {blon} _ n , {in} _ {ci} , {komo} _ t , [e ks p e] _ c , e _ {ci} , {meto} _ k , .#. {ju} _ t .#. ; 
define neNiShared [m aa d] | [ts i e r] | {iad} | [t e l e v ii z] | [t e r m aa l] | [.#. e v i] | [zh i b a b i] | [n b a b i] | [m a t i] | [.#. k a t i] | [l i i] | [i n i] | [ii n i] | [o n i] | [g i] | [r i] | [m e i] | [t i n i] | [\.#. k i] | [v i i] ;
define neExceptions [n e] @-> [ŧne] || _ {gat} | [g aa c] | {nt} | {nc} | {oklas} | {ore} | [oo] | {rv} | {utral} | [u t r aa l] | [u t r oo n] | [ks t] , .#. _ [h e m i aa] , .#. {be} _ f , {fo} _ , {li} _ [\c & \.#.] , g | {ske} | t | {to} | v _ r , [a d m i n i s t r a t ii v] | {ge} _ , {mag} | [p e r s o n aa l] | {pyre} | [r e aa l] | [r uo z] | [oo d] _ , [sh p e c i aa l] | [t e hh] | [zh i a d] _ , e _ {rg} , .#. {re} _ s , {ba} | [t r ee] _ r , {me} _ [zh] , .#. _ [o p r ee n] , {pa} _ l , [aa d] | [aa l] | [ii z] | [ii zh] | {riad} | {vii} _ {ho} .#. , {av} | [aa v] | {ed} | {na} | t | {ba} | {ca} | [hh a] | {riha} | {rha} | [aa h a] | [aa j a] | [ii j a] | {ka} | {la} | {ma} | {skapa} | {iepa} | {kopa} | {erpa} | {ypa} | [aa p a] | {ra} | [ii s a] | {ta} | {sa} | {za} | [ts a] | [lj a] | [nj a] | [sh a] | [zh a] | [tj a] | {iame} | {lme} | {lome} | {rome} | [ks] | [aa l e] _ j .#. , {zele} | {iale} | {bale} | {vale} | {cle} | {dle} | {dele} | {iele} | {mele} | {tele} | {hle} | {kle} | {mle} | {ole} | {ple} | {sle} | {zle} | [sh l e] _ j .#. , _ [ts k o] .#. , .#. o | {vi} _ n .#. , [zh i a r] _ , [t ii] _ [dzh] , [m yy t] _ , .#. | g | i | l | o | r | {tra} _ t .#. | [t y .#.] | [t a .#.] | [t u .#.] | {tom} | {tov} | [t u .#.] | {te} .#. | [t o hh] | {tmi} | {tami} , [ts] _ j .#. , [[\m & \l] e] _ j .#. , i _ j .#. , o _ j .#. , ConsonantPhonem _ j .#. , [ts i e r] _ , {va} _ j .#. , [t ii v] _ {mu} .#. , {vin} _ \.#. , {da} _ j .#. , [lj] _ j .#. , {oriad} _ {mu} , _ [p aa l [e | o | u | s | ts | .#.]] , [uu d] | [uu r] _ {ho} , {mi} _ [r aa l] , [i n t e r] _ \.#. , [k r ee t] | [.#. p r aa z d] _ [\.#. & \j] , .#. _ {uro} \[b | d | v] , [.#. p aa d] _ .#. , [o l aa r] | [p u l aa r] _ {ho} | {mu} , [p a t o g ee n] _ .#. , [ts ii t a] _ j .#. , {ko} _ {ktor} | {ktu} | {ktov} , [ii m] | [ii v] _ [h o .#.] , {kabi} _ t , {in} _ {ci} , {kyber} _ t, [zh aa] _ r , [aa l] | {iel} | [ii v] | [n] | {ier} | [aa r] | {st} | [uu t] | [sh t] | [sh t] | [aa v] | [ee z] | [aa zh] | [ii z] _ [h o .#.] | [m u .#.] , [sh t aa t] _ .#. , {to} _ [aa l] , _ [o g ee n] , {re} _ {san} , {ki} _ {mati} , p _ {um} , {ki} _ t , {sy} _ {rg} , {kala} _ {tik} | [t ii k] , _ [k t aa r] , _ {apol} , {mi} _ {ral} , m _ {mo} , _ [u r aa l] | [u r oo n] , {gy} _ {ko} , {tu} _ [[l .#.] | [l y] | [l a] | [l aa] | [l o] | [l u] | [l i] | [l m]] , {pla} _ [t aa] | {tk} | {to} , {er} _ {st} , .#. [zh a] _ t , _ [r aa r] , {klau} _ , k _ [d lj] | [d i e lj] | [d l] , {ro} | .#. _ [l [a | y | .#. | e | aa | u | o]] , _ {bul} , neNiShared _ .#. ; 
# reconsidered správne sociálne rule [s o c i aa l] | [s p r aa v] _ , 
define neForeignExceptions [n e] @-> [ŧne] || .#. k _ {dlo} .#. , [rz ?*] _ , _ [?* rz] ; 
define niExceptions [n i] @-> ŧni || [g ee] | .#. {mo} _ , {bota} | {endro} | {go} | [g oo] | {harmo} | [h a r m oo] _ , {kolo} | [k o l oo] | [l ii] | [m e hh a] | [t e hh] | [t r ee] | {tro} _ , _ {kot} , .#. {tu} _ s , a _ m , {fo} _ c , [hh] _ c | k , {orga} _ c | z , {ro} _ c | k , {te} _ s , i _ {ci} , {mu} _ k | s , {tago} _ s , .#. {ge} | {imu} _ , o _ k | s , {admi} _ s , _ {zmus} .#. , .#. [uu] _ a | e | i | o | u | [ii] , {defi} _ t , [f ee] _ [ks] , [j uu] _ , [\r aa] _ a | e | {ou} | u , .#. {va} _ l , _ {hilist} , {fi} _ c | t | [ts] , {ma} _ {fe} | {pul} | [p uu r] , {mu} _ [ts] , {tur} _ {ket} , [hh r o] _ z , [d aa v] _ , {kog} _ , {homoge} _ , {se} _ {or} , {hygie} _ , {vulka} _ {ck} , {pa} _ k | {ck} , {huma} _ {st} | t | z , {mag} _ [t uu d] , [f i d ee r] | [s i o n aa l] _ .#. , .#. _ [g ee r] , {ze} _ t , [b r i t aa] _ , {biz} _ s , {se} _ l , [m oo d] _ .#. , {galva} _ c | z , {bo} | {perso} _ {fik} , {bo} _ [f aa] , {amerika} | {vulka} | [m o ŧde r] _ z , u _ {ce} \.#. | {fi} | {fo} | {jn} | [k aa t] | [k oo] | l | {on} | [oo n] | {par} | s | t | {va} | {ver} | [ks] , {kli} _ (c) k , {komu} _ t , {cy} | {et} | {fre} | {ge} | {hym} | {iko} | {kano} | {lako} | {rako} | {so} | {to} | {ume} _ {ck} | k , {afrika} | {ago} | {alba} | {amerika} | {alpi} | {arme} | {balka} | {germa} | {hispa} | {japa} | {religio} | {roma} | {slova} | {slove} | {ugrofi} | {urba} _ s | z , .#. _ {tro} , {karbo} _ c | z , [.#. s ee] _ u , {eter} _ t , [.#. ŧde] _ s , {mu} _ c | {pol} , {ju} _ {or} , {pia} _ {st} , {ver} _ [s aa] , {mi} _ [\e & \a] | .#. , {sig} _ f , .#. _ {kol} [.#. | a | aa | e | k | o | u | [i e] | y] , oo _ ShortVowelPhonem, [[.#. | .#. n e] a k t ii v] _ .#. , .#. {pe} _ s , [l ee] _ [a | aa | ii | u | o] , neNiShared _ .#. ;
# removed spálni rule [aa l] _ , 
define niForeignExceptions [n i] @-> [ŧni] || [rz ?*] _ , _ [?* rz] ; 
define niiExceptions [n ii] @-> [ŧnii] || [ŧde r] _ .#. , {mu} _ c , {vole} _ , [ŧde f i] _ c , {buz} | {ent} | {er} | {ere} | {ert} | {il} | [l u sh] | {op} | {ot} | [ts a s] | [ts e] _ .#. , {ek} | [e ts] | {in} | {patr} | {tat} | [u ts] _ .#. , .#. i _ .#. , {atki} _ .#. , .#. o _ .#. , {der} | {pred} _ .#. , {odne} _ .#. , {kog} _ , [e lj] _ .#. , [a ts] _ .#. , {ved} _ .#. , [t o ts] _ .#. , {moc} _ .#. , [p o l o ts] _ .#. , {kro} _ k , .#. _ [l .#.] | [l u .#.] | [l e .#.] | [l o m .#.] , [a ŧdi ts] _ .#. , [[\b & \c & \r & \t & \v & \z] o v a] _ , {fareb} _ .#. , [\ll zh e] _ .#. , [aa m o r] | [aa r o d] _ .#. , {odda} | {smut} | [sh i k o v] _ .#. , [s m ae d] _ , {hlad} _ .#. , {komu} _ t , [t e hh] _ k , {okoj} | {opoj} _ .#. , {be} _ {gn} , {mad} _ .#. ; 
# Controvertial rule {ave} _ for word nastavení
define niiForeignExceptions [n ii] @-> [ŧnii] || [rz ?*] _ \.#. , _ [?* rz] ; 
